Illinois, session 104th, HB2460.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Commemorative Dates Act is amended by 5adding Section 197 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 490/197 new)7    Sec. 197. Hero Day. August 27 of each year is designated as 8Hero Day, to be observed as a day throughout the State to 9recognize those whose unwavering commitment to public safety 10has earned them our great respect, esteem, and gratitude. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.